Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1208
Employee or student; proceedings authorized; prohibited acts.

A collegiate athletic association, college, or university which subjects, or causes to be subjected, any employee or student to a penalty in violation of the Nebraska Collegiate Athletic Association Procedures Act shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress. No penalty shall be threatened against or imposed upon an aggrieved party for seeking redress pursuant to this section. In addition to any other relief granted, an aggrieved employee or student shall be awarded costs and a reasonable attorney's fee.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 8.